Idaho, session 2025, H0383.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1802. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Dyslexia" means a specific learning challenge that is neurolog-
ical in origin. It is characterized by difficulties with accurate or flu-
ent, or both, word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities,
which typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of lan-
guage that is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and
the provision of effective classroom instruction.
(2) "Dyslexia screening tools" means assessments in the areas of phono-
logical awareness skills, phonemic decoding efficiency, rapid automatic
naming skills, encoding ability, and sight work reading efficiency skills in
order to identify students that demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia or
other reading difficulties.
(3) "Idaho comprehensive literacy plan" means the state board of educa-
tion-approved, evidence-based plan outlining the minimum statewide liter-
acy comprehension expectations and framework. This plan shall include de-
tails on data literacy, the statewide summative reading assessment, and best
practices.
(4) "Independent literacy expert" means an outside expert selected by
the state board of education who:
(a) Has a verifiable track record of improving student literacy out-
comes in public schools as measured by summative reading assessments;


(b) Has expertise in the science of reading and experience delivering
high-quality professional development and coaching on the science of
reading to administrators and teachers;
(c) Has experience analyzing student data alongside educator practice
to create customized plans for improvement;
(d) Has experience coaching administrators and teachers on designing
and implementing data-driven school improvement plans; and
(e) Has experience establishing and implementing effective multi-
tiered systems of support focused on literacy.
(4) (5) "Local education agency" or "LEA" means a school district, in-
cluding charter school districts, or a public charter school identified as
an LEA pursuant to chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code.
(6) "Science of reading" means a body of evidence-based research on
the cognitive processes involved in learning to read and effective instruc-
tional practices based on phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary,
and comprehension.
(5) (7) "Statewide Summative reading assessment" means the a state
board of education-approved assessment for facilitating continuous im-
provement, tailoring student-level instruction, and providing summative
results.
(8) "Three-cueing system" means an instructional approach based on
meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues, which may also be known as
"MSV."
SECTION 2. That Section 33-1804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1804. IDAHO COMPREHENSIVE LITERACY PLAN. (1) The state board of
education shall develop an Idaho comprehensive literacy plan designed to
create a framework for all students to be proficient in literacy and prepared
to read and learn in the next grade level, as applicable to the student's
grade. The comprehensive literacy plan shall be evidence-based, aligned
with the science of reading, and include the identification of best prac-
tices for literacy development and interventions.
(2) The state board of education shall convene a group of education
stakeholders consisting of, at a minimum, representation from the Idaho
public school system and postsecondary education system with experience in
literacy development and reading instruction and parents to review and make
recommendations to the state board of education on updates to the Idaho com-
prehensive literacy plan. The comprehensive literacy plan shall be reviewed
and updated at least every five (5) years.
(3) The comprehensive literacy plan shall:
(a) Identify the state's strategy to ensure students develop strong
literacy skills needed for future learning;
(b) Set expectations for LEA-level leadership collaboration, profes-
sional development for staff, effective instruction and interventions,
and the use of assessments and data for setting locally established stu-
dent proficiency and growth targets that align with state-level growth
targets; and
(c) Identify evidence-based practices and tools aligned to the compre-
hensive literacy plan.


SECTION 3. That Section 33-1805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1805. STUDENT READING INSTRUCTION AND INTERVENTION. (1) It is the
ultimate goal of the legislature that every student read at or above grade
level by the end of grade 3. School districts shall offer a reading inter-
vention program pursuant to this section to each kindergarten through grade
3 student who exhibits a reading deficiency on the statewide summative read-
ing assessment pursuant to section 33-1806, Idaho Code, to ensure students
can read at or above grade level at the end of grade 3. The reading inter-
vention program shall be provided in addition to core reading instruction
that is provided to all students in the general education classroom and must
be in alignment with the Idaho comprehensive literacy plan. All reading in-
struction shall be aligned with the science of reading and shall not include
strategies or material that use three-cueing. The reading intervention pro-
gram shall:
(a) Be provided to all kindergarten through grade 3 students identi-
fied with a reading deficiency or identified with characteristics of
dyslexia as determined by the statewide summative reading assessments;
(b) Provide intensive development in phonemic awareness, phonics,
fluency, vocabulary, and text comprehension as applicable to the grade
level; and
(c) Monitor the reading progress of each student's reading skills
throughout the school year and adjust instruction according to student
needs. Monitoring may include both local and statewide formative and
summative assessments.
(2) Reading improvement plan. Any student in kindergarten through
grade 3 who exhibits a deficiency in reading at any time based on the
statewide summative assessment shall receive an individual reading improve-
ment plan no later than thirty (30) days after the identification of the
reading deficiency. The reading improvement plan shall be created by the
teacher, principal, other pertinent school personnel, including staff-as-
signed library duties if applicable, and the student's parent or guardian
and shall describe the reading intervention services the student will re-
ceive to remedy the reading deficit. Each student must receive intensive
reading intervention until the student is determined to be proficient in
reading for the student's grade level.
(a) Having made a good faith effort, should the school be unable to en-
gage the parent or guardian in the development of the student's reading
improvement plan within fifteen (15) days of notifying the parent, the
school may move forward with the creation of the student's reading im-
provement plan without parental participation.
(b) Any student who has been identified as not proficient through a
local literacy formative assessment may also be put on a reading im-
provement plan.
(c) Students who are on a reading improvement plan and have been identi-
fied through the statewide summative assessment to be at grade level may
be transitioned off of the reading improvement plan. Schools must no-
tify the parents or guardians in advance of transitioning students off
of their reading improvement plan.


(3) Parent notification. The parent of any student in kindergarten
through grade 3 who exhibits a deficiency in reading at any time during
the school year must be notified in writing of the reading deficiency. The
school district shall assist schools with providing written notification to
the parent of any student who has not met grade-level proficiency.
(a) The initial notification must include the following:
(i) A statement that the student has been identified as having
a deficiency in reading and that a reading improvement plan will
be established by the teacher, principal, other applicable school
personnel, and the parent or guardian;
(ii) A description of the current services that are provided to
the student; and
(iii) A description of the available reading intervention and sup-
plemental instructional services and supports that could be pro-
vided to the student that are designed to address the identified
areas of reading deficiency.
(b) Following development of the plan, the parent will be provided
with:
(i) A description of the reading intervention and supplemental
instructional services and support that will be provided to the
student that are designed to address the identified areas of read-
ing deficiency; and
(ii) Strategies for parents to use at home in helping their stu-
dent to succeed in reading.
(c) At the conclusion of each school year, or earlier if it has been
determined that the student is proficient and is no longer in need of
intervention, the parent or guardian will be updated on the student's
progress, including any recommendation for placement.
(4) District annual reporting. Each school district shall report to
the state department of education by October 1 of each year the number and
percentage of students, by grade level, on an individualized reading im-
provement plan.
(5) Department responsibilities. The state department of education
shall annually compile the information required along with state-level sum-
mary information and annually report such information to the state board of
education, the public, the governor, and the legislature. The department
shall provide technical assistance as needed to aid school districts in im-
plementing the provisions of this section.
(6) The state board of education may promulgate rules for the adminis-
tration and implementation of this section.
SECTION 4. That Section 33-1806, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1806. READING AND LITERACY ASSESSMENT. (1) The state department of
education shall be responsible for administration of all assessment efforts
and shall train LEA-level assessment personnel and report results.
(2) In continuing recognition of the critical importance of reading
skills, all public school students in kindergarten through grade 3 shall
have their reading skills assessed. For purposes of this assessment, the
Idaho comprehensive literacy plan shall be the reference document. The


kindergarten assessment shall include reading readiness and phonological
awareness. Grades 1, 2, and 3 shall test for fluency, comprehension, and
accuracy of the student's reading. The Beginning in the 2025-2026 school
year, the assessment shall be by a single statewide summative test specified
vetted by the state board of education, and the. Beginning in the 2027-2028
school year, such assessment shall be selected by the LEA. The state board
of education shall vet and approve three (3) or more reliable and valid sum-
mative assessments from which LEAs may choose. LEAs shall employ a compre-
hensive system of assessments that also includes formative assessments and
progress monitoring. The state department of education shall ensure that
testing shall take place no fewer than two (2) times per year in the relevant
grades. Additional assessments may be administered to students who are
identified for reading interventions as set forth in section 33-1805, Idaho
Code. The state K-3 summative assessment test results shall be reviewed by
school personnel for the purpose of providing necessary interventions to
sustain or improve the students' reading skills. Results shall show for each
school building with kindergarten through grade 3 in each school district
and charter school the percentage of students who are achieving profi-
ciency on the statewide summative reading assessment. Such results shall
be maintained and compiled by the state department of education and shall be
reported annually to the public through the state education dashboard and
reported to the state board of education, the legislature, and the governor
in a consistent manner, by school and by district.
(3) The assessment scores and interventions recommended and imple-
mented shall be maintained in the permanent record of each student.
(4) The administration of the state K-3 summative assessments is to
be done in the local school districts by individuals chosen by the district
other than the regular classroom teacher. All those who administer the as-
sessments shall be trained by the state department of education.
(5) It is the legislature's intent that curricular materials utilized
by school districts for kindergarten through grade 3 shall be tied to the
science of reading and evidence-based best practices and aligned with the
Idaho comprehensive literacy plan. Such materials shall not employ three-
cueing systems.
SECTION 5. That Section 33-1807, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1807. LITERACY INTERVENTION PROGRAM. (1) Each school district and
public charter school shall establish an extended time literacy interven-
tion program for students who score basic or below basic on the fall reading
screening assessments or alternate reading screening assessment in kinder-
garten through grade 3 and submit it to the state board of education.
(2)(a) The program shall provide:
(i) Proven effective evidence-based substantial intervention
and shall include phonemic awareness, decoding intervention, vo-
cabulary, comprehension, and fluency as applicable to the student
based on a formative assessment designed to, at a minimum, iden-
tify such weaknesses;


(ii) A minimum of sixty (60) hours of supplemental instruction for
students in kindergarten through grade 3 who score below basic on
the reading screening assessment; and
(iii) A minimum of thirty (30) hours of supplemental instruction
for students in kindergarten through grade 3 who score basic on the
reading screening assessment.
(b) The program may include adaptive learning technology literacy
intervention tools as part of the literacy intervention program, must
shall include parent input, and be in alignment with the Idaho com-
prehensive literacy plan, and. Adaptive learning technology literacy
intervention tools shall be from the state board of education-approved
provider list established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
Districts are encouraged to use adaptive learning technology literacy
intervention tools independent from the summative assessment. Online
or digital instructional materials that are not part of a comprehensive
program do not have to be from the approved provider list.
(3)(a) The Subject to appropriation, the state board of education shall
select and purchase licenses for districts to use for adaptive learning
technology literacy intervention providers through a an open request
for proposals process to provide adaptive learning technology liter-
acy intervention tools for school districts and charter schools to use
as part of their literacy intervention programs for students in kinder-
garten through grade 3 that:
(i) Include an academic program focused on building age-appro-
priate literacy skills that, at a minimum, include phonological
awareness, phonics, fluency, comprehension, and vocabulary;
(ii) Use an evidence-based early intervention model;
(iii) Include a parental engagement and involvement component
that allows parents to participate in their student's use of the
tool at school or at home; and
(iv) Address early reading and literacy intervention through the
use of an interactive and adaptive computer software program.
(b) To remain on the approved provider list after the first year of
identification, programs must shall be evaluated each year every three
(3) years to determine effectiveness by an independent external eval-
uator. The evaluation will shall be based on a full academic year of
implementation of tools implemented with fidelity and will shall in-
clude, at a minimum, growth toward proficiency measures. A provider
does not need to have a minimum number of students to be evaluated. How-
ever, if the Idaho data is not sufficient for evaluation, the provider
may be compelled to provide additional evidence of efficacy based on
data from other similarly situated students. Providers shall be al-
lowed to submit a proposal at any time throughout the year.
(4) The state board of education shall identify national evi-
dence-based best practices and proven effective state intervention prac-
tices. The state department of education shall share state board of educa-
tion-identified intervention practices with school districts and charter
schools throughout the state and maintain a resource center of best prac-
tices for literacy intervention for students in kindergarten through grade


3. The resource center shall include, at a minimum, resources for parents
and schools.
(5) Of the funds appropriated for the purpose of this section, no more
than one hundred dollars ($100) per student may be used for transportation
costs.
(6) For the purpose of program reimbursement, the state department of
education shall adopt reporting forms, establish reporting dates, and adopt
such additional guidelines and standards as necessary to accomplish the pro-
gram goals that every child will read fluently and comprehend printed text on
grade level by the end of third grade 3.
(7) To ensure students receive high-quality literacy instruction and
intervention, the state department of education shall provide professional
development to districts and schools on best practices supporting literacy
instruction that includes data literacy, the statewide reading assessment,
and best practices as outlined in the Idaho comprehensive literacy plan. In-
tervention program participation and effectiveness by school and district
shall be presented annually to the state board of education, the legisla-
ture, and the governor.
(8) The state board of education or its delegate shall annually evalu-
ate the cost and efficacy of literacy interventions used throughout Idaho.
(9) The state board of education may promulgate rules implementing the
provisions of this section. At a minimum, such rules shall include state-
level student trajectory growth to proficiency benchmarks and a timeline for
reaching such benchmarks. The state board of education shall present the
state-level growth targets to the legislature for approval in 2026.
SECTION 6. That Section 33-1809, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1809. ACCOUNTABILITY AND CONTINUOUS IMPROVEMENT. (1) In recog-
nition of the critical role leadership plays in creating a culture in our
schools around continuous improvement, it is the intent of the legislature
to provide local school boards of trustees and charter school boards of
directors with the resources necessary to work effectively with school lead-
ership to set goals and growth targets.
(2) All newly elected or appointed board members shall participate in
at least one (1) board member orientation focused on:
(a) State and school district or charter school resources available for
literacy intervention and improvements;
(b) School, district, and state level data available to track progress
on student literacy proficiency and growth toward proficiency; and
(c) How to set measurable goals for improving student proficiency.
(3) Every board of trustee member or charter school director shall par-
ticipate in the literacy intervention orientation and training by June 30,
2023, or as provided by the state board of education thereafter.
(4) School district districts and charter schools shall set annual lit-
eracy proficiency and growth targets for students in kindergarten through
grade 3. Such growth targets shall meet or exceed state-level growth tar-
gets.
(5) Literacy proficiency and growth targets shall align with the con-
tinuous improvement plan goals and targets of the school district or charter


school and the framework for schools to achieve statewide literacy growth
targets. Goal-setting and growth targets shall be based on comparisons
between similar cohorts of students in similar school buildings and school
districts.
(6) There shall be a statewide dashboard available for school per-
sonnel, parents, the governor, and the legislature to use to view progress
toward the school's literacy proficiency and growth targets and statewide
progress toward the statewide literacy growth targets set by the state board
of education. Information shall be available by school level based on like
cohorts of students in similar schools and school districts.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 18, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1809A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1809A. ADDITIONAL LITERACY INTERVENTION -- SCHOOL LITERACY
PLAN. (1) On or before December 31, 2025, the state board of education shall
identify two (2) or more approved independent literacy experts through a
request for proposals process. The approved list shall be evaluated by an
external evaluator every three (3) years. The state board of education shall
contract with the independent literacy experts and shall specify a payment
schedule and payment conditions with up to fifty percent (50%) of the fee
contingent on successful outcomes.
(2) The state board of education shall establish criteria for schools
that need additional literacy intervention. Beginning in 2026, on or before
July 1 of each year, the state board of education shall designate a cohort of
elementary schools in need of additional literacy intervention.
(3) Each school district board of trustees overseeing each elementary
school in the cohort shall select an approved independent literacy expert.
(4) Once selected, the independent literacy expert shall work with the
school for three (3) years to:
(a) Collect and analyze data on the school's student achievement, per-
sonnel, culture, curriculum, assessments, instructional practices,
multi-tiered systems of support, leadership, and policies;
(b) Conduct a comprehensive needs assessment during the initial reme-
dial year for the school, which shall include recommended changes to the
school's instructional practices, materials, assessments, culture,
leadership, multi-tiered systems of support, or other areas based on
data collected pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Develop and implement, in partnership with the school principal,
staff, and board of trustees, a school literacy plan designed to bring
the school into alignment with the performance standards and growth
targets established under section 33-1809, Idaho Code. Such plan shall
include:
(i) The findings and recommendations of the comprehensive needs
assessment as described in paragraph (b) of this section;
(ii) Measurable student achievement goals and objectives;
(iii) A professional development strategy that addresses gaps in
implementation of the science of reading;
(iv) A leadership development strategy focused on proven strate-
gies to implement the science of reading;


(v) Recommendations for necessary changes to instructional mate-
rials and assessments to align with the science of reading;
(vi) A strategy to assess and monitor progress;
(vii) A strategy to communicate and report data on progress to
stakeholders; and
(viii) A timeline for implementation;
(d) Monitor the effectiveness of the school literacy plan provided for
in paragraph (c) of this subsection and provide ongoing implementation
support;
(e) Provide high-quality, job-embedded professional development and
coaching in the science of reading designed to improve:
(i) The leadership capacity of the school principal;
(ii) The instructional capacity of the school staff; and
(iii) The collaborative practices of teacher and leadership teams
to implement an effective multi-tiered system of support;
(f) Leverage support from families and community partners to coordi-
nate the efficient delivery of literacy support to students both inside
and outside the classroom;
(g) Collaborate as needed with the state board of education; and
(h) Report on progress under the school literacy plan annually or upon
request.
(5) The independent literacy expert shall submit the school literacy
plan provided for in this section to the school district board of trustees
and the state board of education for approval.
(6) If a school in the cohort implements a school literacy plan with fi-
delity but fails to improve within three (3) years, the state board of edu-
cation may extend the partnership with the independent literacy expert de-
scribed in this section for up to two (2) years.
SECTION 8. That Section 33-1811, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1811. DYSLEXIA. (1) The state department of education shall iden-
tify reliable, valid, evidence-based screening tools and intervention prac-
tices to evaluate the literacy skills of students enrolled in kindergarten
through grade 5 for characteristics of dyslexia and shall provide profes-
sional development in multisensory-structured literacy approaches.
(2) Starting in the 2022-2023 school year, and each year thereafter,
the state department of education will shall ensure that districts adminis-
ter a statewide tier 1 dyslexia screening measure for identifying students
with characteristics of dyslexia in kindergarten through grade 3. The fall
administration of the statewide summative reading assessment shall be used
as the tier 1 screening measure for students in kindergarten through grade
3, except as provided in section 33-1618, Idaho Code. The state depart-
ment of education shall support local education agencies in implementing
tier 1 screeners for students in grades 4 and 5. A local education agency
must administer a tier 2 dyslexia diagnostic measure to students in kinder-
garten through grade 5 who have been identified as having characteristics
of dyslexia based on the tier 1 screening measure or who have been identi-
fied by their classroom teacher or at the request of the student's parent or
guardian. All parents or guardians of students identified with character-


istics of dyslexia shall be notified and provided with the local education
agency's options for school interventions.
(3) Local education agencies shall provide evidence-based inter-
ventions in alignment with the Idaho comprehensive literacy plan and the
state dyslexia handbook for any students identified with characteristics of
dyslexia. The state department of education will provide technical assis-
tance by:
(a) Providing local education agencies with guidance and resources
for general education teachers and school teams to identify charac-
teristics of dyslexia and to provide intervention and remediation to
students;
(b) Identifying reliable, valid, and evidence-based tools and multi-
sensory-structured literacy approaches for students in kindergarten
through grade 5 that have been identified with characteristics of
dyslexia;
(c) Identifying reliable, valid, and evidence-based tier 2 screening
and diagnostic measures for use by local education agencies; and
(d) Developing reporting mechanisms for local education agencies to
submit information and required data as determined by the state board
of education for evaluating the effectiveness of the intervention pro-
grams.
(4) The state department of education shall maintain a list of courses
that fulfill the professional development requirements prescribed in this
section. The list may consist of online or classroom learning models. Each
identified course must align with the Idaho comprehensive literacy plan and
the state dyslexia handbook. Such courses must be multisensory-structured
literacy professional development for teachers in evidence-based dyslexia
screening and intervention practices for identifying characteristics of
dyslexia and understanding the pedagogy for instructing students with
dyslexia.
(a) No later than the beginning of the 2023-2024 school year, each in-
structional staff member and instructional coach employed by a local
education agency involved in the instruction of students in kinder-
garten through grade 5, including those providing special education
instruction, shall be required to have received professional develop-
ment specific to providing instruction and intervention to students
with characteristics of dyslexia.
(b) No later than the beginning of the 2023-2024 school year, all teach-
ers, administrators and school counselors with an instructional cer-
tificate in grades 6 through 12 shall be required to have received pro-
fessional development on the characteristics of dyslexia.
(c) No later than the beginning of the 2025-2026 school year, all
Idaho teachers or and administrators with an all subjects (K-8) en-
dorsement, exceptional child generalist endorsement, blended early
childhood/early childhood special education endorsement, administra-
tor certificate, or school counselor certificate serving students in
kindergarten through grade 5 will be required to earn one (1) or more
credits of professional development identifying characteristics of
dyslexia and understanding the pedagogy for instructing students with
dyslexia and providing dyslexia-focused interventions to recertify.


SECTION 9. That Section 33-1002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1002. EDUCATIONAL SUPPORT PROGRAM. The educational support pro-
gram is calculated as follows:
(1) State Educational Support Funds. Add the state appropriation, in-
cluding the moneys available in the public school income fund, together with
all miscellaneous revenues to determine the total state funds.
(2) From the total state funds subtract the following amounts needed
for state support of special programs provided by a school district:
(a) Pupil tuition-equivalency allowances as provided in section
33-1002B, Idaho Code;
(b) Transportation support program as provided in section 33-1006,
Idaho Code;
(c) Feasibility studies allowance as provided in section 33-1007A,
Idaho Code;
(d) The approved costs for border district allowance, provided in sec-
tion 33-1403, Idaho Code, as determined by the state superintendent of
public instruction;
(e) The approved costs for exceptional child approved contract al-
lowance, provided in subsection 2. of section 33-2004, Idaho Code, as
determined by the state superintendent of public instruction;
(f) Salary-based apportionment calculated as provided in sections
33-1004 through 33-1004F, Idaho Code;
(g) Unemployment insurance benefit payments according to the provi-
sions of section 72-1349A, Idaho Code;
(h) For expenditure as provided by the public school technology pro-
gram;
(i) For employee severance payments as provided in section 33-521,
Idaho Code;
(j) For distributions to the Idaho digital learning academy as provided
in section 33-1020, Idaho Code;
(k) For charter school facilities funds and reimbursements paid pur-
suant to section 33-5207, Idaho Code;
(l) For an online course portal as provided for in section 33-1024,
Idaho Code;
(m) For advanced opportunities as provided for in chapter 46, title 33,
Idaho Code;
(n) For additional math and science courses for high school students as
provided in section 33-1021, Idaho Code;
(o) For master teacher premiums as provided in section 33-1004I, Idaho
Code;
(p) For the support of provisions that provide a safe environment con-
ducive to student learning and maintain classroom discipline, an allo-
cation of three hundred dollars ($300) per support unit;
(q) An amount specified in the appropriation bill for the public
schools educational support program for counseling support as provided
for in section 33-1212A, Idaho Code, shall be distributed for grades 8
through 12 as follows:


(i) For school districts and public charter schools with one hun-
dred (100) or more students enrolled in grades 8 through 12, a pro
rata distribution based on students enrolled in grades 8 through
12 or eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000), whichever is greater;
(ii) For school districts and public charter schools with fewer
than one hundred (100) students enrolled in grades 8 through 12,
one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per student enrolled in grades
8 through 12 or nine thousand dollars ($9,000), whichever is
greater;
(r) An amount specified in the public schools educational support pro-
gram appropriation bill for literacy intervention. The disbursements
made to the school districts and public charter schools shall be calcu-
lated as follows:
(i) Fifty percent (50%) based on average full-time equivalent
enrollment of students in kindergarten through grade 3 as of the
first Friday in November;
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) based on the number of kindergarten
through grade 3 students who move a full level or who are profi-
cient from the spring-to-spring administration of the statewide
summative reading assessment in the prior fiscal year or, if there
is not a prior spring assessment for the student, from fall to
spring; and
(iii) Funds will be distributed to the school district or pub-
lic charter school where the student is enrolled and takes the
statewide summative reading assessment. Any school district or
public charter school that has greater than one (1) but fewer than
five (5) students in kindergarten through grade 3 will receive a
minimum of two thousand dollars ($2,000). Economically disad-
vantaged students shall count as one and three quarters (1.75)
students for the purpose of calculating the distribution of the
funds in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph.
(s) For mastery-based education as provided for in section 33-1632,
Idaho Code;
(t) For pay for success contracting as provided in section 33-125B,
Idaho Code; and
(u) Any additional amounts as required by statute to effect administra-
tive adjustments or as specifically required by the provisions of any
bill of appropriation;
to secure the total educational support distribution funds.
(3) Average Daily Attendance. The total state average daily attendance
shall be the sum of the average daily attendance of all of the school dis-
tricts of the state. The state board of education shall establish rules set-
ting forth the procedure to determine average daily attendance and the time
for, and method of, submission of such report. Average daily attendance cal-
culation shall be carried out to the nearest hundredth. Computation of av-
erage daily attendance shall also be governed by the provisions of section
33-1003A, Idaho Code.
(4) Support Units. The total state support units shall be determined
by using the tables set out hereafter called computation of kindergarten
support units, computation of elementary support units, computation of sec-


ondary support units, computation of exceptional education support units,
and computation of alternative school support units. The sum of all of the
total support units of all school districts of the state shall be the total
state support units.
COMPUTATION OF KINDERGARTEN SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily
Attendance Attendance Divisor Units Allowed
41 or more.... 40...................... 1 or more as computed
31 - 40.99 ADA.... -....................... 1
26 - 30.99 ADA.... -....................... .85
21 - 25.99 ADA.... -....................... .75
16 - 20.99 ADA.... -....................... .6
8 - 15.99 ADA.... -....................... .5
1 - 7.99 ADA.... -....................... count as elementary
COMPUTATION OF ELEMENTARY SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
300 or more ADA....... ............................... .. 15
..23...grades 4,5 & 6....
..22...grades 1,2 & 3....1994-95
..21...grades 1,2 & 3....1995-96
..20...grades 1,2 & 3....1996-97
and each year thereafter.
160 to 299.99 ADA... 20................................ 8.4
110 to 159.99 ADA... 19................................ 6.8
71.1 to 109.99 ADA... 16................................ 4.7
51.7 to 71.0 ADA... 15................................ 4.0
33.6 to 51.6 ADA... 13................................ 2.8
16.6 to 33.5 ADA... 12................................ 1.4
1.0 to 16.5 ADA... n/a............................... 1.0
COMPUTATION OF SECONDARY SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
750 or more.... 18.5..............................47
400 - 749.99 ADA.... 16................................28
300 - 399.99 ADA.... 14.5..............................22
200 - 299.99 ADA.... 13.5..............................17
100 - 199.99 ADA.... 12................................9


99.99 or fewer Units allowed as follows:
Grades 7 - 12 ..................................8
Grades 9 - 12 ..................................6
Grades 7 - 9 ..................................1 per 14 ADA
Grades 7 - 8 ..................................1 per 16 ADA
COMPUTATION OF EXCEPTIONAL EDUCATION SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
14 or more.... 14.5..............................1 or more as
computed
12 - 13.99.... -.................................1
8 - 11.99.... -..................................75
4 - 7.99.... -..................................5
1 - 3.99.... -..................................25
COMPUTATION OF ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL SUPPORT UNITS
(Computation of alternative school support units shall include
grades 6 through 12)
Pupils in Attendance Attendance Divisor Minimum Units
Allowed
12 or more.......... 12................................ 1 or more as
computed
In applying these tables to any given separate attendance unit, no
school district shall receive less total money than it would receive if it
had a lesser average daily attendance in such separate attendance unit. In
applying the kindergarten table to a kindergarten program of fewer days
than a full school year, the support unit allowance shall be in ratio to the
number of days of a full school year. The attendance of students attending
an alternative school in a school district reporting fewer than one hundred
(100) secondary students in average daily attendance shall not be assigned
to the alternative table if the student is from a school district reporting
fewer than one hundred (100) secondary students in average daily attendance,
but shall instead be assigned to the secondary table of the school district
in which they are attending the alternative school, unless the alternative
school in question serves students from multiple districts reporting fewer
than one hundred (100) secondary students in average daily attendance. The
tables for exceptional education and alternative school support units shall
be applicable only for programs approved by the state department of educa-
tion following rules established by the state board of education. Moneys
generated from computation of support units for alternative schools shall be
utilized for alternative school programs. School district administrative
and facility costs may be included as part of the alternative school expen-
ditures.


(5) State Distribution Factor per Support Unit. Divide educational
support program distribution funds, after subtracting the amounts necessary
to pay the obligations specified in subsection (2) of this section, by the
total state support units to secure the state distribution factor per sup-
port unit.
(6) District Support Units. The number of support units for each school
district in the state shall be determined as follows:
(a)(i) Divide the actual average daily attendance, excluding stu-
dents approved for inclusion in the exceptional child educational
program for the administrative schools and each of the separate
schools and attendance units, by the appropriate divisor from the
tables of support units in this section, then add the quotients
to obtain the district's support units allowance for regular stu-
dents, kindergarten through grade 12 including alternative school
students. Calculations in application of this subsection shall be
carried out to the nearest hundredth.
(ii) Divide the combined totals of the average daily attendance
of all preschool, kindergarten, elementary, secondary, juvenile
detention center students and students with disabilities approved
for inclusion in the exceptional child program of the district by
the appropriate divisor from the table for computation of excep-
tional education support units to obtain the number of support
units allowed for the district's approved exceptional child pro-
gram. Calculations for this subsection shall be carried out to the
nearest hundredth when more than one (1) unit is allowed.
(iii) The total number of support units of the district shall be
the sum of the total support units for regular students, subpara-
graph (i) of this paragraph, and the support units allowance for
the approved exceptional child program, subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph.
(b) Total District Allowance Educational Program. Multiply the dis-
trict's total number of support units, carried out to the nearest hun-
dredth, by the state distribution factor per support unit and to this
product add the approved amount of programs of the district provided in
subsection (2) of this section to secure the district's total allowance
for the educational support program.
(c) District Share. The district's share of state apportionment is the
amount of the total district allowance, paragraph (b) of this subsec-
tion.
(d) Adjustment of District Share. The contract salary of every noncer-
tificated teacher shall be subtracted from the district's share as cal-
culated from the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(7) Property Tax Computation Ratio. In order to receive state funds
pursuant to this section, a charter district shall utilize a school mainte-
nance and operation property tax computation ratio for the purpose of calcu-
lating its maintenance and operation levy that is no greater than that which
it utilized in tax year 1994, less four-tenths of one percent (.4%). As used
herein, the term "property tax computation ratio" shall mean a ratio deter-
mined by dividing the district's certified property tax maintenance and op-
eration budget by the actual or adjusted market value for assessment pur-


poses as such values existed on December 31, 1993. Such maintenance and op-
eration levy shall be based on the property tax computation ratio multiplied
by the actual or adjusted market value for assessment purposes as such values
existed on December 31 of the prior calendar year.
SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.